Washington statutes.
RCW 34.05.522

Refusal of review by court of appeals. (Effective until July 1, 2026.)

The court of appeals may refuse to accept direct review of a case pursuant to RCW 34.05.518 if it finds that the case does not meet the applicable standard in RCW 34.05.518. The refusal to accept such review is not subject to further appellate review, notwithstanding anything in Rule 13.3 of the Rules of Appellate Procedure to the contrary.

[ 2021 c 305 s 3; 1995 c 382 s 6; 1988 c 288 s 504; 1980 c 76 s 2. Formerly RCW 34.04.135.]

NOTES:

Expiration date—2021 c 305 ss 2 and 3: See note following RCW 34.05.518.

Effective date—2021 c 305: See note following RCW 36.70C.150.

PDFRCW 34.05.522

Refusal of review by court of appeals. (Effective July 1, 2026.)

The court of appeals may refuse to accept direct review of a case pursuant to RCW 34.05.518 if it finds that the case does not meet the applicable standard in *RCW 34.05.518 (2) or (5). The refusal to accept such review is not subject to further appellate review, notwithstanding anything in Rule 13.3 of the Rules of Appellate Procedure to the contrary.

[ 2021 c 305 s 6; 1995 c 382 s 6; 1988 c 288 s 504; 1980 c 76 s 2. Formerly RCW 34.04.135.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 34.05.518 was amended by 2024 c 347 s 2, deleting subsection (5).

Effective date—2021 c 305 ss 5 and 6: See note following RCW 34.05.518.